Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1928.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2 of the act of October 17, 2008 (P.L.1645, No.132), known as the Home Improvement Consumer Protection Act, is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Individual with a disability." An individual 18 years of age or older who, because of a mental or physical incapacity, is unable to properly manage or care for the individual's person, 12345678910111213141516171819 property or both.* * *"Qualified caregiver." An individual who is 18 years of age or older and:(1) a caregiver residing with an individual with a disability;(2) an agent under a durable power of attorney; or(3) a court-appointed guardian of an individual with a disability.* * *Section 2. Section 8(c)(4) of the act is amended to read:Section 8. Home improvement fraud.* * *(c) Grading.--* * *(4) Where a person commits an offense under subsection (a) and the victim is [60] 55 years of age or older, an individual with a disability or a qualified caregiver, the grading of the offense shall be one grade higher than specified in paragraphs (1), (2) and (3). This paragraph shall not be applicable to persons whose sentence would be enhanced pursuant to paragraph (5).* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1928PN2412 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324